Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-401
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-401 to 43-431 shall be known and may be cited as the Health and Human Services, Office of Juvenile Services Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 33;

Laws 2012, LB972, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB1140, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 1.